zh-CN: 空气炸锅功能: 空气烤; 空气炸; 烘烤; 炙烤; 对流; 脆炸; 脱水; 发酵; 烧烤; 保温; 披萨; 醒发; 再加热; 烤; 旋转烤; 煎; 慢炖; 蒸; 吐司; 酸奶; 其他
pt-PT: Funções da Air fryer: Assar na Airfryer; Fritar na Airfryer; Cozer; Assar; Convecção; Crisp; Desidratar; Fermentar; Grill; Manter quente; Pizza; Reduzir; Reaquecer; Assar; Churrasco; Alourar; Cozimento lento; Vapor; Tostar; Iogurte; Outro
cs: Funkce vzduchové fritézy: Horkovzdušné grilování; Horkovzdušné fritování; Pečení; Opékání na grilu; Konvekce; Křupavé; Dehydratace; Fermentace; Grilování; Udržovat teplé; Pizza; Kynutí; Ohřev; Opékání; Rožnění; Prudké opékání; Pomalé vaření; Pára; Toast; Jogurt; Jiné
el: Λειτουργίες φριτέζας αέρος: Ψήσιμο στον αέρα; Τηγάνισμα στον αέρα; Φούρνισμα; Ψήσιμο στη σχάρα; Ψήσιμο με κυκλοφορία αέρα; Τραγανό ψήσιμο; Αποξήρανση; Ζύμωση; Γκριλ; Διατήρηση θερμοκρασίας; Πίτσα; Φούσκωμα; Ζέσταμα; Ψήσιμο; Ψήσιμο στη σούβλα; Θωράκισμα; Αργό μαγείρεμα; Μαγείρεμα στον ατμό; Φρυγάνισμα; Γιαούρτι; Άλλο
th: ฟังก์ชันของหม้อทอดไร้น้ำมัน: ย่างด้วยลมร้อน; ทอดด้วยลมร้อน; อบ; ย่าง; การพาความร้อน; อบกรอบ; ทำให้แห้ง; หมัก; ย่าง; อุ่น; พิซซ่า; ป้องกัน; อุ่นร้อนอีกครั้ง; ย่าง; เครื่องย่าง; เซียร์; สโลว์คุก; นึ่ง; ปิ้ง; โยเกิร์ต; อื่นๆ
en: Air fryer functions: Air broil; Air fry; Bake; Broil; Convection; Crisp; Dehydrate; Ferment; Grill; Keep warm; Pizza; Proof; Reheat; Roast; Rotisserie; Sear; Slow cook; Steam; Toast; Yogurt; Other
bg-BG: Функции на фритюрниците с горещ въздух: Печене на въздух; Пържене на въздух; Печене; Печене на скара; Конвекция; Хрупкав; Дехидратиране; Ферментиране; Скара; Поддържане топло; Пица; Доказателство; Повторно затопляне; Изпичане; Ротисерия; Изсушаване; Бавно готвене; Пара; Тост; Кисело мляко; Други
da: Airfryer-funktioner: Luftstege; Airfry; Bage; Stege; Konvektion; Sprød; Dehydrere; Fermentere; Grill; Holde varm; Pizza; Bevis; Genopvarme; Stege; Rotisserie; Svide; Langsom tilberedning; Dampe; Riste; Yoghurt; Andet
ro-RO: Funcții friteuză cu aer cald: Rumenire rapidă cu aer cald; Prăjire cu aer cald; Coacere; Rumenire rapidă; Convecție; Crocant; Deshidratare; Fermentare; Grătar; Menținere la cald; Pizza; Creșterea aluatului de drojdie; Reîncălzire; Friptură; Rotisor; Rumenire; Gătire lentă; Abur; Toast; Iaurt; Altele
zh-TW: 氣炸鍋功能: 旋風烤; 氣炸; 烤; 烤; 對流; 脆; 脫水; 發酵; 炙烤; 保溫; 披薩; 防止; 再加熱; 烤; 烤肉店; 炙燒; 慢燉鍋; 蒸氣; 吐司; 優格; 其他
hr-HR: Funkcije friteze na vrući zrak: Pečenje na vrućem zraku; Prženje na vrućem zraku; Pečenje; Pečenje s gornjim grijačem; Konvekcija; Prženje; Dehidracija; Fermentiranje; Roštilj; Održavanje toplim; Pizza; Dizanje tijesta; Podgrijavanje; Pečenje na višim temperaturama; Pečenje na ražnju; Kratko prženje; Sporo kuhanje; Kuhanje na pari; Tostiranje; Izrada jogurta; Ostalo
pl: Funkcje frytkownicy beztłuszczowej: Podgrzewanie powietrzem od góry; Smażenie na gorącym powietrzu; Pieczenie; Podgrzewanie od góry; Konwekcja; Chrupiące; Odwodnienie; Fermentacja; Grill; Utrzymanie ciepła; Pizza; Wyrastanie; Podgrzanie; Pieczenie w wysokiej temperaturze; Pieczenie na rożnie; Obsmażanie; Wolnowar; Para; Opiekanie; Jogurt; Inne
it: Funzioni della friggitrice ad aria: Grigliatura ad aria; Frittura ad aria; Cottura al forno; Grigliatura; Convezione; Croccante; Essicazione; Fermentazione; Grill; Tenere al caldo; Pizza; Proof; Riscaldare; Arrosto; Girarrosto; Rosolatura; Cottura lenta; A vapore; Tostatura; Yogurt; Altro
fr: Fonctions de la friteuse à air: Gril à l’air; Friture à l’air; Cuisson; Gril supérieur; Convection; Croustillant; Déshydratation; Fermentation; Gril; Maintien au chaud; Pizza; Levée; Réchauffage; Rôtissage; Rôtissoire; Saisie; Cuisson lente; Vapeur; Grille-pain; Yogourt; Autre
fi: Kiertoilmakypsentimen toiminnot: Paistaminen kiertoilmalla; Ilmafriteeraus; Leipominen; Hiillostaminen; Konvektio; Rapea; Kuivaaminen; Käyttäminen; Grillaus; Lämpimänä pitäminen; Pizza; Koettaminen; Uudelleen kuumentaminen; Paistaminen; Varras; Ruskistaminen; Hauduttaminen; Höyrytys; Paahtaminen; Jogurtti; Muu
sl-SI: Funkcije cvrtnika na vroč zrak: Kuhanje na žaru na vroč zrak; Cvrenje na vroč zrak; Peka; Kuhanje na žaru; Konvekcija; Hrustljavo; Dehidracija; Fermentacija; Peka na žaru; Hraniti na toplem; Pizza; Hajanje; Ponovno segrevanje; Pečenje; Rotisserie; Popeka; Počasno kuhanje; Kuhanje na pari; Toast; Jogurt; Drugo
nl: Airfryerfuncties: Lucht braden; Airfryen; Bakken; Braden; Convectie; Krokant; Uitdrogen; Fermenteren; Braden; Warm houden; Pizza; Rijzen; Verwarmen; Braden; Rotisserie; Schroeien; Langzaam koken; Stoom; Toast; Yoghurt; Andere
tr: Airfryer fonksiyonları: Hava ızgarası; Airfryer; Pişirmek; Izgarada Pişirmek; Konveksiyon; Çıtır; Kurutma; Fermentasyon; Izgara; Sıcak tut; Pizza; Mayalama; Isıtma; Kızartma; Çevirme; Kavurma; Yavaş pişirme; Buhar; Tost; Yoğurt; Diğer
ko: 에어 프라이어 기능: 에어브로일; 에어 프라이; 빵 굽기; 브로일; 컨벡션; 크리스프; 탈수; 발효; 그릴; 보온; 피자; 프루프; 재가열; 로스트; 로티세리; 시어링; 슬루우 쿠킹; 스팀; 토스트; 요거트; 기타
lt-LT: Karšto oro gruzdintuvės funkcijos: Troškinimas karštame ore; Gruzdinimas karštame ore; Kepimas; Troškinimas; Konvekcija; Skrudinimas; Džiovinimas; Fermentavimas; Kepimas ant grotelių; Šilumos palaikymas; Pica; Kildinimas; Pašildymas; Apskrudinimas; Rotisserie; Apkepimas; Lėtasis virimas; Gaminimas garuose; Skrudinta duona; Jogurtas; Kita
vi: Chức năng của nồi chiên không dầu: Nướng bằng không khí; Chiên không dầu; Nướng; Nướng; Đối lưu; Giòn; Khử nước; Lên men; Nướng; Giữ ấm; Pizza; Chống; Làm nóng lại; Nướng; Quay; Nấu nhừ; Nấu chậm; Hấp; Nướng; Sữa chua; Khác
hu: Air fryer funkciói: Forrólevegős roston sütés; Forrólevegős sütés; Sütés; Roston sütés; Konvekció; Ropogósra sütés; Szárítás; Fermentálás; Grillezés; Melegen tartás; Pizza; Próbasütés; Újramelegítés; Átsütés; Grillsütés; Pecsenyesütés; Lassú főzés; Párolás; Pirítás; Joghurt; Egyéb
sv: Airfryerfunktioner: Airbroil; Airfry; Ugnsstekning; Halstring; Konvektion; Knaperstekning; Lufttorkning; Fermentering; Grillning; Värmning; Pizza; Jäsa; Återuppvärmning; Ugnsgrillning; Rotisserie; Bryning; Långkok; Ångning; Rostning; Yoghurt; Övrigt
es: Funciones de la freidora de aire: Asar al aire; Freír al aire; Hornear; Asar; Convección; Crujiente; Deshidratar; Fermentar; Parrilla; Mantener caliente; Pizza; Prueba; Recalentar; Asar; Asador; Sellar; Cocción lenta; Vapor; Tostar; Yogur; Otros
sk-SK: Funkcie teplovzdušnej fritézy: Vzduchové grilovanie; Vzduchové vyprážanie; Pečenie; Opekanie; Konvekcia; Chrumkavé opekanie; Odvodnenie; Fermentovanie; Grilovanie; Udržiavanie tepla; Pizza; Skúšanie; Zohrievanie; Praženie; Ražeň; Prudké opečenie; Pomalé varenie; Naparovanie; Hriankovanie; Jogurt; Iné
ja: エアフライヤーの機能: エアブロイル; エアフライ; ベイク; ブロイル; コンベクション; クリスプ; 乾燥; 発酵; グリル; 保温; ピザ; 生地発酵; 温め直し; ロースト; ロティサリー; シアリング; スロークック; スチーム; トースト; ヨーグルト; その他
nb: Airfryerens funksjoner: Luftgrilling; Luftsteking; Bake; Grille; Konveksjon; Sprø; Dehydrere; Fermentere; Grille; Hold varm; Pizza; Heve; Varm opp igjen; Stek; Rotisseri; Brune; Langsom tilberedning; Damp; Riste; Yoghurt; Annet
de: Funktionen der Heißluftfritteuse: Heißluftgrillen; Heißluftfrittieren; Backen; Grillen; Konvektion; Frisch; Entwässern; Fermentieren; Grillen; Warm halten; Pizza; Gären; Aufwärmen; Braten; Rotisserie; Anbraten; Schongaren; Dämpfen; Toast; Joghurt; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Funções da Air Fryer: Grelhar sem óleo; Fritar sem óleo; Assar bolo; Grelhar; Convecção; Crocante; Desidratar; Fermentar; Grade; Aquecer; Pizza; Fermentação lenta; Reaquecer; Assar; Rotisserie; Selar; Cozimento lento; Vapor; Tostar; Iogurte; Outro
ru: Функции аэрогриля: Жарка на воздухе; Жарка на аэрогриле; Выпекание; Жарка; Конвекция; Подрумянивание; Сушка; Ферментация; Гриль; Подогрев; Пицца; Расстойка; Разогрев; Обжарка; Вертел; Обжиг; Готовка на медленном огне; Готовка на пару; Поджаривание; Йогурт; Другое